Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-133
Furnas.

The county of Furnas shall contain that territory described as townships one, two, three and four, north, of ranges twenty-one, twenty-two, twenty-three, twenty-four and twenty-five, west.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 63, p. 224;

R.S.1913, § 846;

C.S.1922, § 748;

C.S.1929, § 25-135;

R.S.1943, § 22-133.